Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB631.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Virtual Mental Health in Schools Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Artificial intelligence."(1) A machine-based system that can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions, recommendations or decisions influencing real or virtual environments, including the ability to:(i) perceive real and virtual environments;1234567891011121314151617 (ii) abstract perceptions made under subparagraph (i) into models through analysis in an automated manner; and(iii) use model inference to formulate options for information or action based on outcomes under subparagraphs (i) and (ii).(2) The term includes generative artificial intelligence."Qualified professional." A mental health professional with a graduate degree and licensed under any of the following:(1) The act of May 22, 1951 (P.L.317, No.69), known as The Professional Nursing Law, as a certified registered nurse practitioner with a clinical specialty in mental health.(2) The act of March 23, 1972 (P.L.136, No.52), known as the Professional Psychologists Practice Act.(3) The act of October 5, 1978 (P.L.1109, No.261), known as the Osteopathic Medical Practice Act, as a physician or physician assistant with clinical experience in mental health.(4) The act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985, as a physician or physician assistant with clinical experience in mental health.(5) The act of July 9, 1987 (P.L.220, No.39), known as the Social Workers, Marriage and Family Therapists and Professional Counselors Act."School entity." A public school, including a charter school or cyber charter school, private school, nonpublic school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school operating within this Commonwealth.20250SB0631PN0635 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Virtual mental health services." Web-based services that include any of the following:(1) Access to an online peer support community.(2) Counseling or mental health support provided by an individual who is not a qualified professional located in this Commonwealth.(3) Behavioral health support provided by artificial intelligence.Section 3. Parental consent to virtual mental health services provided by a school entity.(a) Applicability.--This act applies to all virtual mental health services provided by or in coordination with a school entity.(b) Form requirements.--The school entity shall create a form for obtaining virtual mental health services, which shall contain the following:(1) A summary and scope of the virtual mental health services available.(2) An area for parents or guardians to provide consent.(3) Any other information the school entity deems necessary.(c) Obtaining consent.--Notwithstanding section 1.1(2) of the act of February 13, 1970 (P.L.19, No.10), entitled "An act enabling certain minors to consent to medical, dental and health services, declaring consent unnecessary under certain circumstances," or any other provision of law or regulation, a school entity providing or coordinating virtual mental health services shall annually obtain a completed form with the consent of the parent or guardian of a student who is under 18 years of age prior to providing or coordinating virtual mental health 20250SB0631PN0635 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 services to the student.(d) Consent required.--A school entity may not provide or coordinate any virtual mental health services for a student whose parent or guardian has not provided consent under this section.Section 4. Construction.This act shall not be construed to authorize practice of, or grant immunity from criminal or civil penalty to, an individual who is not a qualified professional who engages in a course of conduct in this Commonwealth that is in violation of a relevant provision of law, rule or regulation.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect July 1, 2025, or immediately, whichever is later.20250SB0631PN0635 - 4 - 1234567891011121314